Utah statutes.
23-20-31.   Requirement to wear hunter orange -- Exceptions.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a) (i)  "Centerfire rifle hunt" means a hunt for which a hunter may use a centerfire rifle, except as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii).

(ii)  "Centerfire rifle hunt" does not include:

(A)  a bighorn sheep hunt;

(B)  a mountain goat hunt;

(C)  a bison hunt;

(D)  a moose hunt;

(E)  a hunt requiring the hunter to possess a statewide conservation permit; or

(F)  a hunt requiring the hunter to possess a statewide sportsman permit.

(b)  "Statewide conservation permit" means a permit:

(i)  issued by the division;

(ii)  distributed through a nonprofit organization founded for the purpose of promoting wildlife conservation; and

(iii)  valid:

(A)  on open hunting units statewide; and

(B)  for the species of big game and time period designated by the Wildlife Board.

(c)  "Statewide sportsman permit" means a permit:

(i)  issued by the division through a public draw; and

(ii)  valid:

(A)  on open hunting units statewide; and

(B)  for the species of big game and time period designated by the Wildlife Board.

(2) (a)  A person shall wear a minimum of 400 square inches of hunter orange material while hunting any species of big game, except as provided in Subsection (3).

(b)  Hunter orange material shall be worn on the head, chest, and back.

(3)  A person is not required to wear the hunter orange material described in Subsection (2):

(a)  during the following types of hunts, unless a centerfire rifle hunt is in progress in the same area:

(i)  archery;

(ii)  muzzle-loader;

(iii)  mountain goat;

(iv)  bighorn sheep;

(v)  bison; or

(vi)  moose; or

(b)  as provided by a rule of the Wildlife Board.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

